Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-450
Accessory after the fact, defined.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 50, p. 1574.